Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Adoptee" means a person who is to be adopted or who has been adopted.

(2) "Adoptive parent" means the person or persons who seek to adopt or have adopted an adoptee.

(3) "Agency" means any public or private association, corporation, or individual licensed or certified by the department as a child-placing agency under chapter 74.15 RCW or as an adoption agency.

(4) "Alleged genetic parent" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 26.26A.010.

(5) "Birth parent" means the woman who gave birth to the child or alleged genetic parent of the child, including a presumed parent under chapter 26.26A RCW, whether or not any such person's parent-child relationship has been terminated by a court of competent jurisdiction. "Birth parent" does not include a woman who gave birth to the child or alleged genetic parent of the child, including a presumed parent under chapter 26.26A RCW, if the parent-child relationship was terminated because of an act for which the person was found guilty under chapter 9A.42 or 9A.44 RCW.

(6) "Child" means a person under eighteen years of age.

(7) "Court" means the superior court.

(8) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families.

(9) "Guardian ad litem" means a person, not related to a party to the action, appointed by the court to represent the best interests of a party who is under a legal disability.

(10) "Individual approved by the court" or "qualified salaried court employee" means a person who has a master's degree in social work or a related field and one year of experience in social work, or a bachelor's degree and two years of experience in social work, and includes a person not having such qualifications only if the court makes specific findings of fact that are entered of record establishing that the person has reasonably equivalent experience.

(11) "Legal guardian" means the department, an agency, or a person, other than a parent or stepparent, appointed by the court to promote the child's general welfare, with the authority and duty to make decisions affecting the child's development.

(12) "Nonidentifying information" includes, but is not limited to, the following information about the birth parents, adoptive parents, and adoptee:

(a) Age in years at the time of adoption;

(b) Heritage, including nationality, ethnic background, and race;

(c) Education, including number of years of school completed at the time of adoption, but not name or location of school;

(d) General physical appearance, including height, weight, color of hair, eyes, and skin, or other information of a similar nature;

(e) Religion;

(f) Occupation, but not specific titles or places of employment;

(g) Talents, hobbies, and special interests;

(h) Circumstances leading to the adoption;

(i) Medical and genetic history of birth parents;

(j) First names;

(k) Other children of birth parents by age, sex, and medical history;

(l) Extended family of birth parents by age, sex, and medical history;

(m) The fact of the death, and age and cause, if known;

(n) Photographs;

(o) Name of agency or individual that facilitated the adoption.

(13) "Parent" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 26.26A.010.

(14) "Relinquish or relinquishment" means the voluntary surrender of custody of a child to the department, an agency, or prospective adoptive parents.

[ 2019 c 46 s 5034. Prior: 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 319; 1993 c 81 s 1; 1990 c 146 s 1; 1984 c 155 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.